Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
PART 1 General Provisions

32-10-60.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Approach” means that distance on either end of a bridge as shall be required to develop the maximum traffic capacity of a bridge, including but not limited to necessary rights of way, grading, paving, minor drainage structures, and such other construction necessary to the approach.

“Authority” means the State Tollway Authority created by the “State Tollway Authority Act,” Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, as amended particularly by Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, and on and after April 30, 2001, also means the State Road and Tollway Authority.

“Bridge” means a structure, including the approaches thereto, erected in order to afford unrestricted vehicular passage over any obstruction in any public road, including but not limited to rivers, streams, ponds, lakes, bays, ravines, gullies, railroads, public highways, and canals.

“Cost of project” means the cost of construction, including relocation or adjustments of utilities; the cost of all lands, properties, rights, easements, and franchises acquired; relocation expenses; the cost of all machinery and equipment necessary for the operation of the project; financing charges; interest prior to and during construction and for such a period of time after completion of construction as shall be deemed necessary to allow the earnings of the project to become sufficient to meet the requirements of the bond issue; the cost of engineering, legal expenses, plans and specifications, and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the financing authorized in this article, the construction of any project, and the placing of the same in operation. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of revenue bonds issued for such project under this article.

“Project” means transportation related undertakings which provide a public benefit, including:

One or more roads or bridges or a system of roads, bridges, and tunnels or improvements thereto included on an approved state-wide transportation improvement program on the Developmental Highway System as set forth in Code Section 32-4-22, as now or hereafter amended, or a comprehensive transportation plan pursuant to Code Section 32-2-3 or which are toll access roads, bridges, or tunnels, with access limited or unlimited as determined by the authority, and such buildings, structures, parking areas, appurtenances, and facilities related thereto, including but not limited to approaches, cross streets, roads, bridges, tunnels, and avenues of access for such system;

Any program for mass transportation or mass transportation facilities as approved by the authority and the department and such buildings, structures, parking areas, appurtenances, and facilities related thereto, including, but not limited to, approaches, cross streets, roads, bridges, tunnels, and avenues of access for such facilities; and

Any project undertaken pursuant to Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 2 of this title.

“Relocation expenses” means all necessary relocation expenses, replacement housing expenses, relocation advisory services, expenses incident to the transfer of real property, and litigation expenses of any individual, family, business, farm operation, or nonprofit organization displaced by authority projects to the extent authorized by the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, as amended by the Uniform Relocation Act Amendments of 1987, Title IV of Public Law 100-17.

(6.1)

“Revenue” or “revenues” shall mean any and all moneys received from the collection of tolls authorized by Code Sections 32-10-64 and 32-10-65, any federal highway funds and reimbursements, any other federal highway assistance received from time to time by the authority, any other moneys of the authority pledged for such purpose, any other moneys received by the authority pursuant to the Georgia Transportation Infrastructure Bank, and any moneys received pursuant to a public-private initiative as authorized pursuant to Code Section 32-2-78.

“Revenue bonds,” “revenue bond,” “bonds,” or “bond” means any bonds, notes, interim certificates, reimbursement anticipation notes, or other evidences of indebtedness of the authority authorized by Part 2 of this article, including without limitation obligations issued to refund any of the foregoing.

“Self-liquidating” means that, in the judgment of the authority, the revenues and earnings to be derived by the authority from any project or combination of projects or from any other revenues available to the authority, together with any maintenance, repair, operational services, funds, rights of way, engineering services, and any other in-kind services to be received by the authority from appropriations of the General Assembly, the department, other state agencies or authorities, the United States government, or any county or municipality or from disbursements from any person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or other type of entity shall be sufficient to provide for the maintenance, repair, and operation and to pay the principal and interest of revenue bonds which may be issued for the cost of such project, projects, or combination of projects.

“Utility” means any publicly, privately, or cooperatively owned line, facility, or system for producing, transmitting, transporting, or distributing communications, power, electricity, light, heat, gas, oil products, passengers, water, steam, clay, waste, storm water not connected with highway drainage, and other similar services and commodities, including publicly owned fire and police, and traffic signals and street lighting systems, which directly or indirectly serve the public. This term also means a person, municipal corporation, county, state agency, or public authority which owns or manages a utility as defined in this paragraph.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 3; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 3; Code 1933, § 95A-1238, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 44; Ga. L. 1976, p. 775, § 3; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1285, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1241, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 227, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-6; Ga. L. 2008, p. 73, § 1/HB 1019; Ga. L. 2017, p. 760, § 1/SB 183; Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 4-2/HB 930; Ga. L. 2021, p. 480, § 4/HB 588; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 7/HB 577; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 32/HB 1428.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in paragraph (5), deleted “and” at the end of subparagraph (A), added “; and” at the end of subparagraph (B), and added subparagraph (C); in paragraph (6.1), deleted “and” preceding “any other moneys” in the middle, and added “, and any moneys received pursuant to a public-private initiative as authorized pursuant to Code Section 32-2-78” at the end; and in paragraph (8), substituted “municipality or from disbursements from any person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or other type of entity” for “municipality,” near the end.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, in paragraph (6.1), substituted “moneys received from: (A) The collection” for “moneys received from the collection” near the beginning; in subparagraph (6.1)(A), deleted “or transit” following “federal highway” twice and substituted “; and” for a period at the end; and added subparagraph (6.1)(B).

The 2021 amendments.

The first 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “transportation related undertakings which provide a public benefit,” for “land public transportation systems” in paragraph (5); substituted “One” for “one” at the beginning of subparagraph (5)(A); substituted “Any” for “any” at the beginning of subparagraph (5)(B); and substituted the present provisions of subparagraph (5)(C) for the former provisions which read: “any project undertaken pursuant to a public-private initiative as authorized pursuant to Code Section 32-2-78.” The second 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, made identical changes.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, redesignated former paragraph (6.1) and subparagraph (6.1)(A) as present paragraph (6.1); in paragraph (6.1), deleted “; and” from the end and revised language and punctuation; and deleted former subparagraph (6.1)(B), which read: “Repealed.”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, “April 30, 2001,” was substituted for “the date of the year 2001 change of the authority’s name” in paragraph (2).

U.S. Code.

The Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 4601

et seq.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

32-10-61.
Continuation of State Tollway Authority as State Road and Tollway Authority.

The State Tollway Authority shall continue to be a body corporate and politic and an instrumentality and public corporation of the state known as the “State Road and Tollway Authority.” It shall have perpetual existence. In said name it may contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, implead and be impleaded, and complain and defend in all courts of this state, subject to the limitations of Code Section 32-10-110.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, Sept.-Oct. Ex. Sess., p. 31, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 2; Code 1933, § 95A-1239, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-7.

32-10-62.
Membership; compensation; officers; bylaws; quorum; record of proceedings.

The members of the authority shall be ex officio the Governor, the commissioner of transportation, the director of the Office of Planning and Budget, one member to be appointed by the Lieutenant Governor and to serve during the term of office of the Lieutenant Governor and until a successor is duly appointed and qualified, and one member to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and to serve during the term of office of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and until a successor is duly appointed and qualified; and membership shall be a separate and distinct duty for which they shall receive no additional compensation. All members of the authority shall be entitled to all actual expenses necessarily incurred while in the performance of duties on behalf of the authority. The authority shall elect one of its members as chairman. It shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer, who need not necessarily be members of the authority. The authority may make such bylaws for its government as is deemed necessary but it is under no duty to do so. A majority of the members of the authority shall constitute a quorum necessary for the transaction of business, and a majority vote of those present at any meeting at which there is a quorum shall be sufficient to do and perform any action permitted to the authority by this article.

No vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of the quorum to transact any and all business as stated in this Code section. Members of the authority shall be accountable as trustees. They shall cause to be kept adequate books and records of all transactions of the authority, including books of income and disbursements of every nature. The books and records shall be inspected and audited by the state auditor at least once a year.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 2; Ga. L. 1962, Ex. Sess., p. 31, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 2; Code 1933, § 95A-1240, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 32; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-8.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, “term of office” was substituted for “term in office” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

32-10-63.
Powers of authority generally.

The authority shall have, in addition to any other powers conferred in this article, the following powers:

To have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure;

To acquire by purchase, lease, exchange, or otherwise and to hold, lease, and dispose of real and personal property of every kind and character for its corporate purposes;

To appoint such additional officers, who need not be members of the authority, as the authority deems advisable and to employ such experts, employees, and agents as may be necessary, in its judgment, to carry on properly the business of the authority; to fix their compensation; and to promote and discharge same;

To acquire in its own name by purchase, on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper, or by condemnation in accordance with any and all existing laws applicable to the condemnation of property for public use, including but not limited to those procedures in Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title, real property or rights or easements therein or franchises necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes; and to use the same so long as its corporate existence shall continue and to lease or make contracts with respect to the use of or to dispose of the same in any manner it deems to the best advantage of the authority, the authority being under no obligation to accept and pay for any property condemned under this article except from the funds provided under the authority of this article; and, in any proceedings to condemn, such order may be made by the court having jurisdiction of the action or proceedings as may be just to the authority and to the owners of the property to be condemned; and no property shall be acquired under this article upon which any lien or other encumbrance exists unless at the time such property is so acquired a sufficient sum of money be deposited in trust to pay and redeem such lien or encumbrance in full;

To make such contracts, leases, or conveyances as the legitimate and necessary purposes of this article shall require, including but not limited to contracts for construction or maintenance of projects, provided that the authority shall consider the possible economic, social, and environmental effects of each project, and the authority shall assure that possible adverse economic, social, and environmental effects relating to any proposed project have been fully considered in developing such project and that the final decision on the project is made in the best overall public interest, taking into consideration the need for fast, safe, and efficient transportation, public services, and the cost of eliminating or minimizing adverse economic, social, and environmental effects. Furthermore, in order to assure that adequate consideration is given to economic, social, and environmental effects of any project under consideration, the authority shall:

Follow the processes required for federal-aid highway projects, as determined by the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, as amended, except that final approval of the adequacy of such consideration shall rest with the Governor, as provided in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph, acting as the chief executive of the state, upon recommendation of the commissioner, acting as chief administrative officer of the Department of Transportation;

In the location and design of any project, avoid the taking of or disruption of existing public parkland or public recreation areas unless there are no prudent or feasible project location alternates. The determination of prudency and feasibility shall be the responsibility of the authority as part of the consideration of the overall public interest;

Not approve and proceed with acquisition of rights of way and construction of a project until: (i) there has been held, or there has been offered an opportunity to hold, a public hearing or public hearings on such project in compliance with requirements of the Federal-aid Highway Act of 1970, as amended, except that neither acquisition of right of way nor construction shall be required to cease on any federal-aid project which has received federal approval pursuant to the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, as amended, and is subsequently determined to be eligible for construction as an authority project utilizing, in whole or in part, a mix of federal funds and authority funds; and (ii) the adequacy of environmental considerations has been approved by the Governor, for which said approval of the environmental considerations may come in the form of the Governor’s acceptance of a federally approved environmental document; and

Let by public competitive bid upon plans and specifications approved by the chief engineer or his or her successors all contracts for the construction of projects, except as otherwise provided for projects authorized under any provisions of Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 2 of this title;

To construct, erect, acquire, own, repair, maintain, add to, extend, improve, operate, and manage projects, as defined in paragraph (5) of Code Section 32-10-60, the cost of any such project to be paid in whole or in part from the proceeds of revenue bonds of the authority, from other funds available to the authority, or from any combination of such sources;

To accept and administer any federal highway funds and any other federal highway assistance received from time to time for the State of Georgia and to accept, with the approval of the Governor, loans and grants, either or both, of money or materials or property of any kind from the United States government or the State of Georgia or any political subdivision, authority, agency, or instrumentality of either of them, upon such terms and conditions as the United States government or the State of Georgia or such political subdivision, authority, agency, or instrumentality of either of them shall impose;

To borrow money for any of its corporate purposes, to issue negotiable revenue bonds payable from revenues of such projects, and to provide for the payment of the same and for the rights of the holders thereof; and

To enter into credit enhancement or liquidity agreements with any person, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or other type of entity for the planning, design, construction, acquisition of land for, financing, refinancing, operating, maintaining, or carrying out of any project. Such credit enhancement or liquidity agreements may be secured by the authority’s loan agreements, deeds to secure debt, security agreements, contracts, or other instruments or funds derived from tolls, fees, or other charges, upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall determine reasonable, including provision for the establishment and maintenance of reserves and insurance funds, provided that the obligation of the authority under any such agreements shall not be general obligation of the authority, but shall be a limited obligation of the authority payable from a specific source of funds identified for such purpose. Any such agreements may further include provisions for guaranty, insurance, construction, use, operation, maintenance, and financing of a project as the authority may deem necessary or desirable;

To exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions, which power is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of Georgia;

To covenant with bondholders for the preparation of annual budgets for each project and for approval thereof by engineers or other representatives designated by the bondholders of each project, as may be provided for in any bond issue resolutions or trust indentures, and to covenant for the employment of experts or traffic engineers;

To lease its property to the United States government, the State of Georgia, or its political subdivisions, including any agency, authority, or instrumentality of the foregoing governments or political subdivisions, as well as to persons, public or private, for the construction or operation of facilities of benefit to the general public;

By or through its authorized agents or employees, to enter upon any lands, waters, and premises in the state for the purpose of making surveys, soundings, drillings, and examinations as the authority may deem necessary or convenient for the purposes of this article; and such entry shall not be deemed a trespass. The authority shall, however, make reimbursement for any actual damages resulting from such activities;

To make reasonable regulations for the installation, construction, maintenance, repairs, renewal, and relocation of pipes, mains, conduits, cables, wires, towers, poles, and other equipment and appliances of any public utility in, on, along, over, or under any project;

To pledge, mortgage, convey, assign, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber any property of the authority, including but not limited to real property, fixtures, personal property, intangible property, revenues, income, charges, fees, or other funds and to execute any lease, trust indenture, trust agreement, resolution, agreement for the sale of the authority’s bonds, loan agreement, mortgage, deed to secure debt, trust deed, security agreement, assignment, or other agreement or instrument as may be necessary or desirable, in the judgment of the authority, to secure such bonds; and

To acquire, accept, or retain equitable interests, security interests, or other interests in any property, real or personal, by deed to secure debt, assignment, security agreement, pledge, conveyance, contract, lien, loan agreement, or other consensual transfer, with any such instrument terminating when the bonds for the project are retired, in order to secure repayment under a credit enhancement or liquidity agreement and taking into consideration the public benefit to be derived from such transfer; and

To do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly given in this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, §§ 9-13; Code 1933, § 95A-1241, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 45; Ga. L. 1988, p. 227, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1994, p. 591, § 11; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-9; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 32/SB 46; Ga. L. 2017, p. 760, § 2/SB 183; Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 4-3/HB 930; Ga. L. 2021, p. 480, § 5/HB 588; Ga. L. 2021, p. 526, § 8/HB 577; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 32/HB 1428.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added “, except as otherwise provided for projects authorized under any provisions of Code Sections 32-2-78 through 32-2-81” at the end of subparagraph (5)(D); designated the existing provisions of paragraph (8) as subparagraph (8)(A); in subparagraph (8)(A), added “and” at the end; added subparagraph (8)(B); designated the existing provisions of paragraph (14) as subparagraph (14)(A); and added subparagraph (14)(B).

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 3, 2018, designated the existing provisions of paragraph (7) as subparagraph (7)(A), and, in subparagraph (7)(A), deleted “or federal transit” following “federal highway” near the beginning and deleted “or transit” following “federal highway” near the middle; and added subparagraph (7)(B).

The 2021 amendments.

The first 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “tollway” preceding “project” near the end of paragraph (5); and substituted “Part 2 of Article 4 of Chapter 2 of this title” for “Code Sections 32-2-78 through 32-2-81” at the end of subparagraph (5)(D). The second 2021 amendment, effective July 1, 2021, made identical changes.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted the former subparagraph (7)(A) designation and deleted former subparagraph (7)(B), which read: “Repealed;”.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a comma was inserted following “agency” in two places in paragraph (7).

U.S. Code.

The Federal-aid Highway Act of 1970, referred to in this Code section, is codified as various sections throughout 23 U.S.C. Ch. 1.

The National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, referred to in this Code section, is codified as

42 U.S.C. § 4321

et seq.

Cross references.

Prohibition against authorizing construction or maintenance of private road, §

32-1-8

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

32-10-63.1.
Exemption for transit service buses, motor vehicles, and rapid rail systems from requirements relating to identification and regulation of motor vehicles.

No provision of Chapter 1 of Title 40 shall apply to any bus, other motor vehicle, or rapid rail system of the authority which provides transit services.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-10-63.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 254, § 1/SB 391.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

32-10-64.
General toll powers; police powers; operation of vehicles through toll collection facilities; penalties; video surveillance authorized.

For the purpose of earning sufficient revenue to make possible, in conjunction with other funds available to the authority, the financing of the construction or acquisition of projects of the authority with revenue bonds, the authority is authorized and empowered to collect tolls on each and every project which it, the department, or local governing authority shall cause to be constructed. It is found, determined, and declared that the necessities of revenue bond financing are such that the authority’s toll earnings on each project or projects, in conjunction with other funds available to the authority, must exceed the actual maintenance, repair, and normal reserve requirements of such projects, together with monthly or yearly sums needed for the sinking fund payments upon the principal and interest obligations of financing such project or projects; however, within the framework of these legitimate necessities of the authority and subject to all bond resolutions, trust indentures, and all other contractual obligations of the authority, the authority is charged with the duty of the operation of all projects in the aggregate at the most reasonable possible level of toll charges; and, furthermore, the authority is charged with the responsibility of a reasonable and equitable adjustment of such toll charges as between the various classes of users of any given project in which the repayment of financing is the primary or exclusive purpose for the exercise of the toll power of the authority.

For the purpose of managing the flow of traffic, the authority is authorized and empowered to collect tolls on each and every project which it, the department, or local governing authority shall cause to be constructed in which managing the flow of traffic is the primary or exclusive purpose. It is found, determined, and declared that the necessities of managing the flow of traffic are such that the authority is charged with the responsibility of taking into consideration value pricing and lane management as those terms are described in subsection (d) of Code Section 40-6-54 in determining toll charges on such projects.

In the exercise of the authority’s toll powers, the authority is authorized to exercise so much of the police powers of the state as shall be necessary to maintain the peace and accomplish the orderly handling of the traffic and the collection of tolls on all projects operated by the authority; and the authority shall prescribe such rules and regulations for the method of taking tolls and the employment and conduct of toll takers and other operating employees as the authority, in its discretion, may deem necessary.

No motor vehicle shall be driven or towed through a toll collection facility, where appropriate signs have been erected to notify traffic that it is subject to the payment of tolls beyond such sign, without payment of the proper toll. In the event of nonpayment of the proper toll, as evidenced by video or electronic recording, the registered owner of such vehicle shall be liable to make prompt payment to the authority of the proper toll and an administrative fee of up to $25.00 per violation to recover the cost of collecting the toll. The authority or its authorized agent shall provide notice to the registered owner of a vehicle, and a reasonable time to respond to such notice, of the authority’s finding of a violation of this subsection. The authority or its authorized agent may provide subsequent notices to the registered owner of a vehicle if such owner fails to respond to the initial notice. The administrative fee may increase with each notice, provided that such fee shall not exceed a cumulative total of $25.00 per violation. Upon failure of the registered owner of a vehicle to pay the proper toll and administrative fee to the authority after notice thereof and within the time designated in such notice, the authority may proceed to seek collection of the proper toll and the administrative fee as debts owing to the authority, in such manner as the authority deems appropriate and as permitted under law. If the authority finds multiple failures by a registered owner of a vehicle to pay the proper toll and administrative fee after notice thereof and within the time designated in such notices, the authority may refer the matter to the Office of State Administrative Hearings. The scope of any hearing held by the Office of State Administrative Hearings shall be limited to consideration of evidence relevant to a determination of whether the registered owner has failed to pay, after notice thereof and within the time designated in such notice, the proper toll and administrative fee. The only affirmative defense that may be presented by the registered owner of a vehicle at such a hearing is theft of the vehicle, as evidenced by presentation at the hearing of a copy of a police report showing that the vehicle has been reported to the police as stolen prior to the time of the alleged violation. A determination by the Office of State Administrative Hearings of multiple failures to pay by a registered owner of a vehicle shall subject such registered owner to imposition of, in addition to any unpaid tolls and administrative fees, a civil monetary penalty payable to the authority of not more than $70.00 per violation. Upon failure by a registered owner to pay to the authority, within 30 days of the date of notice thereof, the amount determined by the Office of State Administrative Hearings as due and payable for multiple violations of this subsection, the motor vehicle registration of such registered owner shall be immediately suspended by operation of law. The authority shall give notice to the Department of Revenue of such suspension. Such suspension shall continue until the proper toll, administrative fee, and civil monetary penalty as have been determined by the Office of State Administrative Hearings are paid to the authority. The authority may seek to collect the debt owed through setoff by the Department of Revenue under procedures set forth in Article 7 of Chapter 7 of Title 48. Actions taken by the authority under this subsection shall be made in accordance with policies and procedures approved by the members of the authority.

The registered owner of a vehicle which is observed being driven or towed through a toll collection facility without payment of the proper toll may avoid liability under this subsection by presenting to the authority a copy of a police report showing that the vehicle had been reported to the police as stolen prior to the time of the alleged violation.

For purposes of this subsection, for any vehicle which is registered to an entity other than a natural person, the term “registered owner” shall be deemed to refer to the natural person who is the operator of such motor vehicle at the time of the violation of this subsection, but only if the entity to which the vehicle is registered has supplied to the authority, within 60 days following notice from the authority or its authorized agent, information in the possession of such entity which is sufficient to identify and give notice to the natural person who was the operator of the motor vehicle at the time of the violation of this subsection.

Any person who shall use or attempt to use any currency or coins other than legal tender of the United States of America or tokens issued by the authority or who shall use or attempt to use any electronic device or equipment not authorized by the authority in lieu of or to avoid payment of a toll shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person, except an authorized agent or employee of the authority, who removes any coin from the pavement or ground surface within 15 feet of a toll collection booth or toll collection machine, except to retrieve coins the person dropped while attempting payment of that person’s toll, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any person who enters without authorization or who willfully, maliciously, and forcibly breaks into any mechanical or electronic toll collection device of the authority or appurtenance thereto shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Any law enforcement officer shall have the authority to issue citations for toll evasions if such officer is a witness to any of the following violations:

A person forcibly or fraudulently passes a toll collection device without payment or refuses to pay, evades, or attempts to evade the payment of such tolls;

A person turns, or attempts to turn, a vehicle around on a bridge, approach, or toll plaza where signs have been erected forbidding such turning; or

A person refuses to pass through the toll collection facility after having come within the area where signs have been erected notifying traffic that it is entering the area where a toll is collectable or where vehicles may not turn around and where vehicles are required to pass through the toll gates for the purposes of collecting tolls.

The authority may in its discretion use such technology, including but not limited to automatic vehicle license tag identification photography and video surveillance, either by electronic imaging or photographic copy, that it deems necessary to aid in the collection of tolls and enforcement of toll violations. Such technology shall not be used to produce any photograph, microphotograph, electronic image, or videotape showing the identity of any person in a motor vehicle except that such technology may be utilized for general surveillance of a toll collection facility for the security of toll collection facility employees.

State and local law enforcement entities are authorized to enter into traffic and toll enforcement agreements with the authority. Any funds received by a state law enforcement entity pursuant to such toll enforcement agreement shall be subject to annual appropriations by the General Assembly to such law enforcement entity for the purpose of performing its duties pursuant to such agreement.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 8; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 15; Code 1933, § 95A-1245, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1091, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 227, § 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 366, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 1-10; Ga. L. 2004, p. 498, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 308, § 1/HB 1190; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1058, § 1/SB 125; Ga. L. 2018, p. 152, § 1/HB 150.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, added the next-to-last sentence of paragraph (c)(1).

32-10-65.
Fixing, revising, charging, and collecting tolls; use and disposition of tolls generally.

The authority is authorized to fix, revise, charge, and collect tolls for the use of each project. Such tolls shall be so fixed and adjusted as to carry out and perform the terms and provisions of any resolution, trust indenture, or contract with or for the benefit of bondholders; and such tolls shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any other commission, board, bureau, or agency of the state. Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, if the repayment of financing is not the primary or exclusive purpose for the exercise of the authority’s toll power, the authority shall not be required to issue or have outstanding bonds or other indebtedness with respect to a project in order to fix, revise, charge, enforce, or collect tolls for such project. The use and disposition of tolls and revenues shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of the trust indenture securing the same, if there are any.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 33; Code 1933, § 95A-1270, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1058, § 2/SB 125; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 32/HB 737.

32-10-65.1.
Expiration of tolls.

Every toll established under this article must expire after a specified period of time and may be extended beyond said time by approval of the State Road and Tollway Authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-10-65.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 32; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1251, § 2-1.

32-10-65.2.
Annual reporting.

The authority shall submit an annual report to the House Committee on Transportation and the Senate Transportation Committee detailing the amount of funds collected pursuant to the exercise of the authority’s toll powers and how such funds have been used or disposed of by the authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-10-65.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 760, § 3/SB 183.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 15 (2017).

32-10-66.
Duty of authority to prescribe rules and regulations for projects generally.

It shall be the duty of the authority to prescribe rules and regulations as approved by the department for the operation of each project constructed under this article, including rules and regulations to ensure maximum use of such project. The authority is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations for the use and occupancy of the project as may be necessary and proper for the public’s safety and convenience, for the preservation of its property, and for the collection of tolls.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 302, § 11; Ga. L. 1972, p. 179, § 18; Code 1933, § 95A-1248, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.